Utah statutes.
53-16-201.   Canine Body Armor Restricted Account -- Creation -- Interest.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Canine Body Armor Restricted Account."

(2)  The restricted account shall be funded by the following amounts:

(a)  contributions deposited into the restricted account in accordance with Section 59-10-1315;

(b)  private contributions;

(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities;

(d)  amounts received in accordance with Subsection 53-16-301(9); and

(e)  interest described in Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  The restricted account shall earn interest.

(b)  Interest earned on the restricted account shall be deposited into the restricted account.

(4)  The commissioner shall distribute money appropriated by the Legislature to the department from the restricted account as provided in Section 53-16-301.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 2011 General Session

